src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON x_21_odd_oi

+Sg:                    nom_R           ;
+Sg:                    nom_end         ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG    gen_n_sg        ;
+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG    gen_n_sg        ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:           par_V           ;
+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var       par_A           ;
!+Sg+Dial/Jok:^Jok       par_A           ;
+Sg:^HMETA              ill_hVVn        ;
+Sg:                    ess_nnA          ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG    sgpl_cases_odd ; !to sgpl_cases_even for cases with
+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG    sgpl_cases_odd ; !to sgpl_cases_even for cases with

+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG              nom_t           ;
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG              nom_t           ;
!+Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG^AO%>i2      gen_tten        ;
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG^AO%>i2       gen_tten        ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG^AO%>i2       gen_tten        ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG^A0%>i2       par_tA         ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2                 par_end         ;
!+Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^AO%>j          par_A           ; ! Use i:j in twolc j, see below
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^AO%>i2          par_tA           ;
+Pl:^HMETA                     ill_hVin        ; ! sykshyin
+Pl:%>i2                          ess_nA          ;
+Pl:%>i2                          com_ne          ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ; !the same affix in sg and pl
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG^AO%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ; !the same affix in sg and pl



LEXICON n_21_odd_C !!= * @CODE@ lainasanat, fiction
+N+Sg: nom_end ;
+N:i x_21_odd_i_oblique ;

LEXICON n_21_odd_i !!= * @CODE@  meininki, tunturi TODO
+N         :     x_21_odd_i ;
+N+Sg      :     nom_R       ;
+N+Sg      :^WG  gen_n    ;

LEXICON x_21_odd_i
  +Sg      :        nom_end               ;
  x_21_odd_i_oblique ;

LEXICON x_21_odd_i_oblique
  +Sg      :^WG     gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:        par_V           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:        par_A           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:        par_A           ;
  +Sg      :^HMETA  ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :        ess_nnA         ;
  +Sg      :^WG     sgpl_cases_odd  ;

  +Pl      :^WG     nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG%>i2 gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG     gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG     gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2    par_tA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:        par_A           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:        par_A           ;
  +Pl      :^HMETA  ill_hiin        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2    ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:        ess_nnA         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:        ess_nnA         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2    com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:        com_nne         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:        com_nne         ;

  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG%>i2 sgpl_cases_even ; ! Adding  to block i:0
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG%>   sgpl_cases_odd  ; ! Adding  to block i:0
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG%>   sgpl_cases_odd  ; ! Adding  to block i:0

!  Tarkista, onko yaml oikein:
!  [24/25][FAIL] meininki+N+Pl+Ess => Missing results: meininkiinä
!  [24/25][FAIL] meininki+N+Pl+Ess => Unexpected results: meininkkiinä
!  [25/25][FAIL] meininki+N+Pl+Com => Missing results: meininkiine
!  [25/25][FAIL] meininki+N+Pl+Com => Unexpected results: meininkkiine

LEXICON n_21_even_i !kommentaari, even tavut 
+N+Sg: nom_end ;
+N: x_21_even_i ;

LEXICON x_21_even_i 
  +Sg      :^WG     gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:        par_V           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:        par_A           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:        par_A           ;
  +Sg      :^HMETA  ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :        ess_nA         ;
  +Sg      :^WG     sgpl_cases_even  ;

  +Pl      :^WG     nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG%>i2 gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG     gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG     gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2    par_tA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:        par_A           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:        par_A           ;
  +Pl      :^HMETA  ill_hiin        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2    ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:        ess_nA         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:        ess_nA         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2    com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:        com_ne         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:        com_ne         ;

  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG%>i2 sgpl_cases_even ; ! Adding  to block i:0
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG%>   sgpl_cases_even  ; ! Adding  to block i:0
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG%>   sgpl_cases_even  ; ! Adding  to block i:0



LEXICON n_21_oi        !!= * @CODE@  Paivukko, perintö, kurkkio
! They differ from n_21_odd_oi in pl par
+N         : x_21_oi ;

LEXICON x_21_oi ! Kommentaari: var ja jok dialektissa oon sg gen "aurinkon" ja sg nom "kuninkas" s.72 norjankielisessä grammatiikissa. 
  +Sg      :                   nom_end         ;
  +Pl      :^WG                nom_t           ;
  +Sg      :^WG                gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:                   par_V           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:                   par_A           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:                   par_A           ;
  +Sg      :^HMETA             ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :                   ess_nnA         ; ! paivukkonna
  +Sg      :^WG                sgpl_cases_odd  ; ! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG^AO%>i2      par_tA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG^AO%>i2      par_tA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG^AO%>i2      par_tA          ;
  +Pl      :^HMETA             ill_hVin        ;
!          +Pl:^AO%>i2            ill_hin         ; ! TODO, only for asioihin, not the others?
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         ess_nA          ; ! paivukoina
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         com_ne          ; ! paivukoine
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         sgpl_cases_even ; ! the same affix in sg and pl
!      +Pl+Ill:^AO^HMETA%>h^V%>i2 n_PxK           ;
         !+Ill:         %>h^V%>i2 n_PxK           ;
!+Ill:h%>i2%>i2     n_PxK ; ! on Sg:ssä hVVn


! n_31_ee ! vanha_n_23
! n_31_lainasana_ee ! vanha_n_23
! n_31_ii ! vanha_n_23ii

LEXICON n_21_oi_AO        !!= * @CODE@  Mustikka, kulkkiija, sivakka, asia (in Var) ! Loppuu a:han!!!!
+N         : x_21_oi_AO ;
+N+Pl      :^AO^HMETA          ill_hVin        ;

LEXICON n_21_oi_ÄÖ        !!= * @CODE@  Kynttilä, tekkiijä, jyrinä - Loppuu ä:hän!!!!
+N         : x_21_oi_AO ;
+N+Pl      :^AO^HMETA          ill_höin        ;

LEXICON x_21_oi_AO
  +Sg      :                   nom_end         ;
  +Pl      :^WG                nom_t           ;
  +Sg      :^WG                gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:                   par_V        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:                   par_A        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:                   par_A        ;
  +Sg      :^HMETA             ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :                   ess_nnA         ; 
  +Sg      :^WG                sgpl_cases_odd  ; 

  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         gen_tten        ;
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         par_tA          ; 
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         ess_nA          ; 
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         com_ne          ; 
  +Pl      :^WG^AO%>i2         sgpl_cases_even ;

LEXICON n_31_ee        !!= * @CODE@  hoppee:hoppe
+N+Dial/Por:        x_31_ee            ;
+N+Dial/Var:^E2I^¤  x_31_ia          ;
+N+Dial/Jok:^¤      x_31_ia          ; ! hopea, not hopia
! TODO TODO TODO this is where it might be going wrong
! Need to distinguish hoppee (silvery) and hoppee (silver)
! Also for Valkkee (white) and valkke (a fire or something similar) TODO TODO TODO
 ! +N+Sg+Nom:   R     Is this extra and wrong?

LEXICON x_31_ee ! for Por
x_31_ee_nomsg ;
x_31_ee_oblique ;

LEXICON x_31_ee_nomsg 
  +Sg+Nom:e       K               ;
!  +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>^WG^A   K    ;

LEXICON x_31_ee_oblique 
  +Sg      :e       gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/-Var:e   par_tA          ;
  +Sg      :e       ill_sseen       ;
  +Sg      :e       ess_nA          ;
  +Sg      :e       sgpl_cases_even ;

  +Pl      :e       nom_t           ;
  +Pl      :e%>i2   gen_tten        ;
  +Pl      :e%>i2   par_tA          ;
  +Pl      :e%>i2   ill_ssiin       ;
  +Pl      :e%>i2   ess_nA          ;
  +Pl      :e%>i2   com_ne          ;
  +Pl      :e%>i2   sgpl_cases_even ;
