src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
itaalia:itaalia n_21_oi_AO ;
alkuhistoorii+Err/Orth:alku#histooria n_21_oi_AO ;
kafeja:kafeja n_21_oi_AO ;
lukkiija:lukkiija n_21_oi_AO ;
kuunteliija:kuunteliija n_21_oi_AO ; 
kirjailiija:kirjailiija n_21_oi_AO ;
kulkkiija+Dial/Var:kulkija n_21_oi_AO ; ! dialekt, var.
halttii+Err/Orth:haltia n_21_oi_AO ; 
puohakka:puohakka n_21_oi_AO ;
patotelakka:patote#lakka n_21_oi_AO ;
kuormakka:kuormakka n_21_oi_AO ;
harakka:harakka n_21_oi_AO ;
hyppysivakka:hyppy#sivakka n_21_oi_AO ;
juolikka:juolikka n_21_oi_AO ;
veinikka:veinikka n_21_oi_AO ;
lehmävasikka:lehmä#vasikka n_21_oi_AO ;
teelusikka:tee#lusikka n_21_oi_AO ;
voisantikka:voi#santikka n_21_oi_AO ;
mustikka:mustikka n_21_oi_AO ;
kiljukka:kiljukka n_21_oi_AO ;
runnukka:runnukka n_21_oi_AO ;
vatukka:vatukka n_21_oi_AO ;
fankila:fankila n_21_oi_AO ;
lompola:lompola n_21_oi_AO ;
nappula:nappula n_21_oi_AO ;
kuutama:kuutama n_21_oi_AO ;
lakana:lakana n_21_oi_AO ;
maakkana:maakkana n_21_oi_AO ;
saatana:saatana n_21_oi_AO ;
skantiina:skantiina n_21_oi_AO ;
kapina:kapina n_21_oi_AO ;
patina:patina n_21_oi_AO ;
haulipatruuna:hauli#patruuna n_21_oi_AO ;
hamara:hamara n_21_oi_AO ;
ruokatavara:ruoka#tavara n_21_oi_AO ;
prinsessa:prinsessa n_21_oi_AO ;
ilmivalkkee:ilmi#valkke n_31_ee ; ! Laitoin adjektiiveihin
valkkee:valkke n_31_ee ; !!= * @CODE@ Is noun, bål
mettäaukkee:mettä#aukke n_31_ee ;
rämmee:rämme n_31_ee ;
lippee:lippe n_31_ee ;
hoppee:hoppe n_31_ee ;
häppee:häppe n_31_ee ;
trafikki:trafikki n_21_odd_i ;
fenrikki:fenrikki n_21_odd_i ;
tvillinki:tvillinki n_21_odd_i ;
rejeerinki:rejeerinki n_21_odd_i ;
pytinki:pytinki n_21_odd_i ;
arkiivimateriaali:arkiivi#materiaali n_21_odd_i ;
manttaali:manttaali n_21_odd_i ;
rinkeli:rinkeli n_21_odd_i ;
meisseli:meisseli n_21_odd_i ;
tekstiili:tekstiili n_21_odd_i ;
kontrolli:kontrolli n_21_odd_i ;
systeemi:systeemi n_21_odd_i ;
moreeni:moreeni n_21_odd_i ;
masiini:masiini n_21_odd_i ;
kanuuni:kanuuni n_21_odd_i ;
komparasuuni:komparasuuni n_21_odd_i ;
rautatiestašuuni:rautatie#stašuuni n_21_odd_i ;
metrostašuuni:metro#stašuuni n_21_odd_i ;
prinsippi:prinsippi n_21_odd_i ;
kommentaari:kommentaari n_21_even_i ; 
plakkari:plakkari n_21_odd_i ;
troolari:troolari n_21_odd_i ;
kupari:kupari n_21_odd_i ;
alttari:alttari n_21_odd_i ;
laakeri:laakeri n_21_odd_i ;
desemperi:desemperi n_21_odd_i ;
myösteri:myösteri n_21_odd_i ;
atomisentteri:atomi#sentteri n_21_odd_i ;
matkakaveri:matka#kaveri n_21_odd_i ;
inspiraattori:inspiraattori n_21_odd_i ;
tohturi:tohturi n_21_odd_i ;
elläinlääkäri:elläin#lääkäri n_21_odd_i ;
kumpassi:kumpassi n_21_odd_i ;
ette-syntakti:ette-#syntakti n_21_odd_i ;
proasti:proasti n_21_odd_i ;
legitimiteetti:legitimiteetti n_21_odd_i ;
uuđistusdepartementti:uuđistus#departementti n_21_odd_i ;
infinitiivi:infinitiivi n_21_odd_i ;
fiction:fiction n_21_odd_C ;
poulakko:poulakko n_21_oi ;
sammakko:sammakko n_21_oi ;
rapakko:rapakko n_21_oi ;
evakko:evakko n_21_oi ;
haulikko:haulikko n_21_oi ;
ummikko:ummikko n_21_oi ;
lumikko:lumikko n_21_oi ;
pounikko:pounikko n_21_oi ;
tarikko:tarikko n_21_oi ;
vittikko:vittikko n_21_oi ;
koivikko:koivikko n_21_oi ;
luođikko:luođikko n_21_oi ;
pajukko:pajukko n_21_oi ;
koijukko:koijukko n_21_oi ;
paivukko:paivukko n_21_oi ;
alanko:alanko n_21_oi ;
keskiyönaurinko:keski#yön#aurinko n_21_oi ;
puolisko:puolisko n_21_oi ;
hinkalo:hinkalo n_21_oi ;
peukalo:peukalo n_21_oi ;
humalo:humalo n_21_oi ;
karpalo:karpalo n_21_oi ;
koskelo:koskelo n_21_oi ;
pursilo:pursilo n_21_oi ;
ratamo:ratamo n_21_oi ;
kertakartano:kerta#kartano n_21_oi ;
numero:numero n_21_oi ;
putkisto:putkisto n_21_oi ;
preesens:preesens n_21_odd_C ;
pahantekkiijä:pahan#tekkiijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ ;
työntekkiijä:työn#tekkiijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ ;
tekkiijä:tekkiijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ ;
eeskävijä:ees#kävijä n_21_oi_ÄÖ ;
kalanpenikkä:kalan#penikkä n_21_oi ;
mursunpenikkä:mursun#penikkä n_21_oi ;
hyysikkä:hyysikkä n_21_oi ;
talikynttilä:tali#kynttilä n_21_oi_ÄÖ ;
kynttilä:kynttilä n_21_oi_ÄÖ ;
siivilä:siivilä n_21_oi ;
jyrinä:jyrinä n_21_oi_ÄÖ ;
pötäjikkö:pötäjikkö n_21_oi ;
mettikkö:mettikkö n_21_oi ;
kivikkö:kivikkö n_21_oi ;
killerö:killerö n_21_oi ;
